Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4719.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [256.0141] HUMAN SERVICES SYSTEMS STEERING COMMITTEE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The Human Services Systems Steering Committee is established to provide recommendations to the commissioners of human services, information technology services, and children, youth, and families on the development, administration, and business operations of human services information technology systems. For the purposes of this section, "human services systems" means any information technology system used by counties or the commissioner of human services or children, youth, and families. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership; costs. new text end new text begin (a) The steering committee must be composed of the following members: new text end new text begin (1) two members appointed by the commissioner of human services; new text end new text begin (2) two members appointed by the commissioner of children, youth, and families; new text end new text begin (3) six members appointed jointly by the Association of Minnesota Counties, the Minnesota Inter-County Association, and the Minnesota Association of County Social Service Administrators; and new text end new text begin (4) two nonvoting members appointed by the commissioner of information technology services. new text end new text begin (b) One member appointed under paragraph (a), clause (3), and one member appointed under paragraph (a), clause (4), must serve as co-chairpersons for the steering committee. new text end new text begin (c) Steering committee costs must be paid from the budgets of the Department of Human Services, the Department of Information Technology Services, and the Department of Children, Youth, and Families. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner of information technology services must organize and administer the steering committee. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin (a) The steering committee must provide recommendations on the administration and business operations of current human services systems and the development of any new human services systems. new text end new text begin (b) For each human services system, the steering committee must make recommendations on setting system goals and priorities, allocating system resources, making major system decisions, and tracking total system funding and expenditures from all sources. new text end new text begin (c) The steering committee must provide monthly updates on the committee's duties under this subdivision to the Legislative Commission on Human Services Systems under section 256.0142. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Meetings. new text end new text begin (a) The steering committee must meet at least quarterly. new text end new text begin (b) As part of every steering committee meeting, the steering committee must provide the opportunity for oral and written public testimony and comments on steering committee recommendations. new text end new text begin (c) All votes of the steering committee must be recorded, with each member's vote identified. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Implementation of changes; new systems. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioners of human services and children, youth, and families must not implement any new major changes to current human services systems, or implement a new human services system, prior to receiving recommendations from the steering committee and consulting with counties on the changes or development. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioners of human services and children, youth, and families must implement changes to human services systems recommended and passed by at least seven members of the steering committee. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin (a) Beginning January 30, 2027, and each January 30 thereafter, the steering committee must report to the Legislative Commission on Human Services Systems under section 256.0142, and to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over human services systems. The report must include: new text end new text begin (1) for each human services system, system funding and expenditures, including amounts received in the previous calendar year by funding source and expenditures made in the previous calendar year by funding source; new text end new text begin (2) recommendations made by the steering committee under subdivision 3; and new text end new text begin (3) a list of projects needed to improve human services systems. new text end new text begin (b) The legislative committees with jurisdiction over human services systems must hold a public hearing on the report during the regular legislative session in the year in which the report was submitted. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [256.0142] LEGISLATIVE COMMISSION ON HUMAN SERVICES SYSTEMS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment; duties. new text end new text begin (a) The Legislative Commission on Human Services Systems is created to: new text end new text begin (1) provide oversight and monitoring of the efforts by the counties and the Departments of Human Services; Information Technology Services; and Children, Youth, and Families to manage, develop, update, and modernize information technology systems across human services programs, including, but not limited to: MAXIS, METS, MMIS, SSIS, PRISM, and MEC2; new text end new text begin (2) evaluate Minnesota's state-supervised, county-administered human services system and provide recommendations for changes, if applicable. This must include evaluating any changes to roles and responsibilities for the administration and delivery of human services programs and services, including program eligibility, case management functions, and use of third-party and nongovernmental entities; new text end new text begin (3) review how other states procure, administer, and deliver human services programs and services and the information technology infrastructure utilized; new text end new text begin (4) identify areas within the governance, procurement, and technology structures of the human services system that need to be addressed by the legislature; new text end new text begin (5) review reports provided to the legislature from state agencies on information technology projects and human services system transformation; and new text end new text begin (6) review reports and updates provided to the commission by the Human Services Systems Steering Committee under section 256.0141. new text end new text begin (b) The commission must work with Minnesota's Tribal Nations, counties, and the Departments of Human Services; Information Technology Services; and Children, Youth, and Families to: new text end new text begin (1) evaluate proposals for any modifications to information technology systems utilized by Minnesota's Tribal Nations, counties, or the Departments of Human Services and Children, Youth, and Families; and new text end new text begin (2) consider overall costs to the state, counties, and Tribal Nations for the implementation of any systems changes, and assess whether proposed solutions deliver improved services to Minnesotans and administrative responsibilities are efficiently delegated across stakeholders. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Members; meetings. new text end new text begin (a) Members of the legislative commission must include: new text end new text begin (1) six members from the house of representatives, including three members appointed by the speaker of the house and three members appointed by the minority leader; and new text end new text begin (2) six members from the senate, including three members appointed by the senate majority leader and three members appointed by the senate minority leader. new text end new text begin (b) Members of the commission serve a term that expires on December 31 of the even-numbered year following the year they are appointed. The speaker of the house and the majority leader of the senate must each designate a chair and vice-chair from the membership of the commission. The chair and vice-chair must rotate after each meeting. new text end new text begin (c) The commission must meet at least quarterly. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Administrative support. new text end new text begin The Legislative Coordinating Commission must provide administrative support to the commission and arrange meeting space for commission meetings. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin By February 15, 2027, and annually thereafter, the commission, in cooperation with the commissioners of human services; information technology services; and children, youth, and families, must provide a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over human services and children, youth, and families. The report must contain information on the results of the commission's evaluations, identifications, and reviews under subdivision 1; recommendations for any legislative changes; and funding needs to implement any recommended changes. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin This commission expires December 31, 2033. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin LEGISLATIVE COMMISSION ON HUMAN SERVICES SYSTEMS; FIRST APPOINTMENTS AND FIRST MEETING.new text end new text begin Appointing authorities for the Legislative Commission on Human Services Systems under Minnesota Statutes, section 256.0142, must make first appointments to, and designate the chairs and vice-chairs of, the Legislative Commission on Human Services Systems by August 15, 2026. The member designated as chair by the majority leader of the senate must convene the first meeting of the commission by September 15, 2026. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin APPROPRIATION; COUNTY INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SYSTEMS UPDATES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Information technology changes; system focused. new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of information technology systems to update county information technology systems. This appropriation must be used, in collaboration with counties, to fund the following projects: new text end new text begin (1) expand Data Depot to all interested Minnesota counties and Tribal Nations; new text end new text begin (2) expand BlueZone Scripting Collaborative to all interested Minnesota counties and Tribal Nations; new text end new text begin (3) expand piloted artificial intelligence tools for human services to all interested Minnesota counties and Tribal Nations; new text end new text begin (4) develop new user interfaces to replace character-based green screens for the MAXIS and PRISM computer systems through the integration layer; new text end new text begin (5) complete the renewal self-service portal in the Minnesota Eligibility Technology System (METS); new text end new text begin (6) copy all state human services systems policies and procedures into the data warehouse and keep the policies and procedures regularly updated; new text end new text begin (7) develop the ability for METS to note when a recipient has a second pregnancy; new text end new text begin (8) determine, in collaboration with Minnesota Management and Budget, the dollar amount needed to fund the integration layer tool and the amount needed to allow full implementation for both the MAXIS and PRISM computer systems; and new text end new text begin (9) other projects decided by the Human Services Systems Steering Committee under Minnesota Statutes, section 256.0141. new text end new text begin (b) Of the amount appropriated under paragraph (a), $....... is for fully funding the work verification vendor system for child support, health care, and public assistance programs. new text end new text begin (c) This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Information technology changes; policy focused. new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of information technology systems to update county information technology systems to conform with legislative changes. This appropriation must be used, in collaboration with counties, to fund the following projects: new text end new text begin (1) develop an automated process in the MAXIS computer system to confirm the eligibility for health care program enrollees; new text end new text begin (2) eliminate the duplicative data entry by county eligibility workers, including integrating MNBenefits with the MAXIS computer system and developing a solution to allow recipients to provide updated information through electronic means; new text end new text begin (3) update the MAXIS computer system to require a county eligibility worker to update the shelter and utility panels in MAXIS every time the address panel is updated for Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) applications; new text end new text begin (4) update the MAXIS computer system to allow the state to move to a simplified reporting method for SNAP so that all recipients will report changes on a six-month timeline; new text end new text begin (5) update the MAXIS computer system with correct coding for time-limited recipients receiving SNAP benefits and integrate the coding with other panels in MAXIS; new text end new text begin (6) update the MAXIS computer system eligibility results to reflect the most recent noncitizen eligibility policy for health care programs and SNAP; new text end new text begin (7) update the MAXIS computer system to eliminate the need for county eligibility workers to enter and approve general assistance and SNAP applications separately within the same system, including the ability for MAXIS to translate information between general assistance and SNAP; new text end new text begin (8) initiate a review and modernization of client notices generated by the MAXIS computer system and METS to ensure the notices are clear, accurate, and compliant with all current federal and state requirements and enhance system functionality so the notices automatically populate correct and complete information based on case actions; new text end new text begin (9) update the MAXIS computer system to allow automatic case noting; and new text end new text begin (10) other projects decided by the Human Services Systems Steering Committee under Minnesota Statutes, section 256.0141. new text end new text begin (b) This is a onetime appropriation. new text end